North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-06.2 Uniform Anatomical Gift Act [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 7]

Note.

See now N.D.C.C. ch. 23-06.6 for current provisions.

23-06.2-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 7.

23-06.2-02.
Making, amending, revoking, and refusing to make anatomical gifts by individual. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 7.

23-06.2-03.
Making, revoking, and objecting to anatomical gifts by others. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 7.

23-06.2-04.
Authorization by coroner or local public health official. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 7.

23-06.2-05.
Request for consent to an anatomical gift — Protocol — Exceptions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 7.

23-06.2-06.
Persons who may become donees — Purposes for which anatomical gifts may be made. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 7.

23-06.2-07.
Delivery of document of gift. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 7.

23-06.2-08.
Rights and duties at death. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 7.

23-06.2-09.
Coordination of procurement and utilization. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 7.

23-06.2-10.
Sale or purchase prohibited — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 7.

23-06.2-11.
Examination — Autopsy — Liability. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 7.

23-06.2-11.1.
Anatomical parts testing — Exception. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 7.

23-06.2-12.
Application. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 7.